Maine, session 132, LD1393.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §224-B is enacted to read:
§224-B. Continuing education for licensed architects
1. Requirement. Beginning July 1, 2026, as a prerequisite to renewal of a licensed
architect's license under section 224, an applicant shall satisfactorily complete continuing
education courses, programs or activities each year in the area of health, safety and welfare
as set forth by rules adopted by the board. The rules must require an applicant to complete
not less than 12 hours of approved health, safety and welfare continuing education as a
condition of renewal. An applicant may not repeat for credit the same continuing education
course, program or activity within a license renewal cycle. An applicant is responsible for
maintaining evidence of that applicant's continuing education hours and shall submit such
evidence of continuing education hours to the board upon renewal of that applicant's
license.
2. Exemption. An architect who receives an initial license to practice architecture
from any jurisdiction, including a foreign jurisdiction, is exempt from the requirements of
subsection 1 for 2 years from the date of issuance of that initial license, as long as the
architect has not been previously licensed by any jurisdiction, including a foreign
jurisdiction, for a period of 2 or more years.
3. Program approval. Each application for approval of a continuing education
course, program or activity must be submitted to the board annually according to the rules
adopted by the board together with any fees required pursuant to section 222.
4. Rulemaking. The board shall adopt rules necessary to carry out this section. Rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules pursuant to Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PROFESSIONAL AND FINANCIAL REGULATION, DEPARTMENT OF
Page 1 - 132LR0986(03)

Administrative Services - Professional and Financial Regulation 0094
Initiative: Allocates funds for the administrative costs of adding one Office Specialist I
position to manage the newly established continuing education requirements for licensed
architects.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $11,117 $14,685
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $11,117 $14,685
Office of Professional and Occupational Regulation 0352
Initiative: Allocates funds for one Office Specialist I position and related All Other costs
to manage the newly established continuing education requirements for licensed architects.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 1.000 1.000
Personal Services $63,613 $91,572
All Other $16,187 $15,588
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $79,800 $107,160
PROFESSIONAL AND FINANCIAL
REGULATION, DEPARTMENT OF
DEPARTMENT TOTALS 2025-26 2026-27
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS $90,917 $121,845
__________ __________
DEPARTMENT TOTAL - ALL FUNDS $90,917 $121,845
Page 2 - 132LR0986(03)